Delaware, session 153, HB120.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. The hill west of Mill Creek where the Spring Grove Mill House sits on New Castle County Parcel number 0803100018 is hereby named âGeneral Washingtonâs Hill of Deceptionâ. Section 2. Where appropriate, maps produced depicting General Washingtonâs Hill of Deception will be labeled as such.